Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-264
County agricultural society; powers
relating to real estate.

With
the consent of the county board of the county within which the real estate
is located, a county agricultural society may exchange its real estate and
improvements for other real estate and improvements or may lease or sell its
real estate and improvements and may make, execute, deliver, and accept all
proper or necessary conveyances relating to such exchange, lease, sale, or
purchase. County board approval is not required for leases having a term of
less than ninety days. The right of the county to real estate and improvements
as provided in section 2-263 shall extend to real estate, improvements, or
proceeds derived from any exchange, sale, or purchase of real estate or improvements
acquired with the additional tax levy provided in section 2-259.

A county agricultural society may purchase real estate and improve the
same. The payment of the purchase price may be secured by mortgage or deed
of trust.

Laws 1879, § 15, p. 401;

Laws 1905, c. 1, § 1, p. 52;

R.S.1913, § 11;

C.S.1922, § 11;

C.S.1929, § 2-206;

Laws 1931, c. 2, § 1, p. 58;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-206;

R.S.1943, § 2-210;

Laws 1967, c. 3, § 1, p. 71;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 2-210;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB597, § 2.